dictionaries/uk/index.dic
Андріїв/jH
бавовняр/4"(K
байдужіння/Q
Балашове/E
бджоляр/4"(K
Беремицьке/E
благозволити/XJN
Боброве/E
богоматір/Fi
боївкар/4"(K
бриньчання/QS
бубняр/4"(K
Бузницький/E
в'являти/YyO
важіль/2@I
Василів/RH2@z
вдавити/XLN
Ведмежа/E
ведмідь/2@I
верховодити/XytJ
весляр/4"(K
взаконення/QS
вибачатися/YyO
виволокти/XN
видалити/XLN
вилізати/YyO
вимести/XM
вимолоти/ZM
вимочитися/XL
вимучитися/XJ
винайти/]N
виплести/XM
виполювання/QS
виспівати/Y'yO
вистудити/XNL
витрамбувати/X'N
Витуле/E
відвантажити/XNJ
віддихатися/YyO
віддружити/XL
відеозвернення/QS
відколоти/XNl
відмести/XM
відплести/XM
відсідати/YyO
відслужитися/XL
відстрочити/XN
вірити/XJyt
вішання/Q
вкоренити/XLM
влупити/XLN
вмлівати/YyO
Возсіятське/E
Володар/4"K
волокти/XytN
вплести/XM
втинатися/YyO
втокмачити/XNJ
втомитися/XL
вторговування/Q
Вугляр/4"K
Ганно-Рудаєве/E
гарнірувати/XytN
гендляр/4"(K
глиняр/4"(K
Голованівський/Ee_
Гонтарів/H
господарство/QS
грабіж/2I
графітяр/4"(K
Гребенне/E
гребінь/2@I
Гринів/H2@z
грякати/YyO
гусінь/FPi
Дегтяр/4"K
дельта-промінь/2@I
демітологізувати/XytN
держрубіж/2I
дикотрав'я/Q
Дігтяр/4"K
дійна/E
ділити/XLytN
дозаселити/XN
долучатися/YyO
домести/XM
домилити/XJN
домолоти/ZlM
домонтар/4"(K
доплести/XM
досмолити/XNL
дочісування/Q
драпувати/XytN
дробар/4"(K
екати/YyO
євроосінь/F
Жовтанецький/Ee_
жовткоутворення/QS
жостір/2I
жрець/4"(K
жужіль/2IFP
заветувати/XN
заволожитися/XJ
загатитися/XL
задубляти/YyO
закабалити/XLN
закріпоститися/XL
Залазько/Q
замести/XM
замолотити/XN
занепокоїти/XJN
заплести/XM
заповідатися/YyO
заповісти/]M
запричаститися/XL
зарум'янити/XJN
затамування/Q
затвердитися/XJ
затемнити/XLN
затіс/2I
затушкувати/XN
зачерпати/YyO
зворушити/XLN
згурдитися/XJ
здрібніння/QS
зельтерська/E
зідентифікувати/XN
Зіновіїв/H
зіставляти/YyO
зліт/4(2I
змести/XM
змолоти/ZMl
знекрасити/XNL
знищити/XJN
зчіплювання/Q
Іванців/H
ікономаляр/1:$x4"(K
ініціювати/XytN
Кареніна/E
картати/YyO
картотекар/4"(K
Кирчів/H
кінооко/Q
Ковалів/2@zH
коломийкар/4"(K
Комзолова/E
корінь/2@I
Кравців/H
крадіж/2I
кремінь/2@I
Кримський/Ee_
кріопошкодження/QS
крутар/4"(K
крутіль/FP
купіль/2IFP
Купіль/Fi
Кучерів/H
кучерявити/XJyt
лебідь/2@I
леміш/2@I
Лепкий/E_
Лесів/H
Либідь/Fi
лиснітися/YyO
Луців/H
лютняр/4"(K
магнеторозвідування/Q
майбутнє/E
Матвіїв/Hj
меблювати/XytN
межінь/F
мести/XytM
метіль/2@IFP
Міжгірне/E
мітляр/4"(K
мовознавство/Q
молоти/ZyMl
навантажити/XJN
навіщати/YyO
наглушити/XLN
надплести/XM
намести/XM
намилити/XJN
наминати/YyO
намірювання/Q
намолоти/ZlM
наоліїти/XN
напівпричіп/2@I
насмітитися/XL
настовбурчитися/XJ
недобачати/YyO
недоплести/XM
недопрацювання/QS
Нежурине/E
непотріб/2@Iz
Новохатське/E
нудяр/4"(K
обгидити/XJN
обгородити/XLN
облагоджування/Q
обмірятися/YyO
обмолоти/ZMl
обсадитися/XL
одсунутися/XJ
окидати/YyO
оплести/XM
оплінь/2@I
Оріль/Fi
осінь/FP
отуманити/XJN
очорнити/XLN
ошпарити/XJN
Павло-Іванівське/E
перевизначення/Q
переключатися/YyO
перелагодити/XJN
перемолоти/ZlM
перемурувати/XN
переоснастити/XLN
пересилитися/XJ
пиляр/4"(K
півкурінь/2@I
підкорити/XLN
підкошування/Q
підкрутитися/XL
підмести/XM
підмивати/YyO'
підмилитися/XJ
підплести/XM
підручний/jEe_
пломінь/2I
повіднаходити/XNJ
повінь/FP
поділити/XLN
покоїтися/XJy
покорчувати/XN
помолоти/ZMl
Пономарів/H
попереводити/XJ
поручатися/YyO
поселити/XLN
постіль/FP
постоляр/4"(K
постояння/Q
посунути/XJNl
Потапський/E
пощепити/XN
пракорінь/2@I
праматір/FPi
призвичити/XJ
прикупитися/XL
приплести/XM
приставлятися/YyO
прителющити/XJ
провакцинувати/XN
провалитися/XL
провесінь/F
промінь/2@I
промучитися/XJ
проплести/XM
просисання/Q
профілювати/XytN
прохарчитися/XL
Проців/H2@z
пучнявіти/YyO
радіопромінь/2@I
Райське/E
розкуйовдити/XJN
розляпування/Q
розмачулитися/XJ
розмитнитися/XL
розмолоти/ZlM
розшиватися/YyO
розщіп/2I
ряджений/Ee_j
самоспоживання/Q
світляр/4"(K
сіткар/4"(K
Скалисте/E
скатувати/XN
скоротити/XLN
славити/XJytN
соляр/1:4"(K
сплести/XM
сподар/4"(K
Спокійне/E
справдження/Q
спрягати/YyO
стеблокорінь/2@I
Стеців/H
струмінь/2@I
студінь/F
схвалити/XLN
сходитися/XLytJ
таріль/2@I
Тарковський/E_
телеказкар/4"(K
темінь/F
тройзіллячко/Q
Убідь/Fi
ударити/XJN
узаконяти/YyO
Ульванський/Ee
уморитися/XL
уплести/XM
уразити/XNJL
Федорців/H
фіґляр/4"(K
Фреїв/H
Харів/H
хвостосховище/QS
хлюскати/YyO
хміль/2I
цивільний/j+E_
чавитися/XytL
червінь/2F
черінь/2@IFP
чмир/1$4"(K
Шевців/H
Шибене/E
Шкляр/4"K
шкодити/XJyt
Щоголів/H
ятір/2@I
Яців/H
ящір/2@Iz
